Utah statutes.
17C-3-108.   Agency required to transmit and record documents after adoption of economic development project area plan.

Within 30 days after the community legislative body adopts, under Section 17C-3-106, an economic development project area plan, the agency shall:

(1)  record with the recorder of the county in which the economic development project area is located a document containing:

(a)  a description of the land within the project area;

(b)  a statement that the project area plan for the project area has been adopted; and

(c)  the date of adoption;

(2)  transmit a copy of the description of the land within the project area and an accurate map or plat indicating the boundaries of the project area to the Automated Geographic Reference Center created under Section 63F-1-506; and

(3)  for a project area plan that provides for the payment of tax increment to the agency, transmit a copy of the description of the land within the project area, a copy of the community legislative body ordinance adopting the project area plan, and a map or plat indicating the boundaries of the project area to:

(a)  the auditor, recorder, attorney, surveyor, and assessor of each county in which any part of the project area is located;

(b)  the officer or officers performing the function of auditor or assessor for each taxing entity that does not use the county assessment roll or collect its taxes through the county;

(c)  the legislative body or governing board of each taxing entity;

(d)  the State Tax Commission; and

(e)  the State Board of Education.

